Maryland, session 2025, SB0302.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Economic Development
10–474.
(a) There is a Maryland Small Business Innovation Research and Technology
Transfer Incentive Program.
(b) The Corporation shall administer the Program.
10–476.
(a) An applicant shall submit an application for a Program award or investment
on the form that the Corporation requires.
(b) The Program shall review the application and all supporting materials to
evaluate whether the applicant qualifies for an award or investment from the Program.
– 1 –

Ch. 201 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(c) (1) Subject to the availability of money in the Fund and paragraph (2) of
this subsection, the Program may provide to an eligible small business an award or
investment to match in part a small business innovation research award or small business
technology transfer award.
(2) The Program shall prioritize providing awards and investments to
eligible small businesses that are engaged in research and development activities that
assist in the prevention of, preparedness for, or response to a public health crisis in the
State.
(d) [Except as provided in subsection (f) of this section, a small business that
receives an award or investment for a Phase I small business innovation research award
or small business technology transfer award shall receive an award or investment in an
amount that is the lesser of:
(1) 25% of the Phase I small business innovation research award or small
business technology transfer award; or
(2) $25,000.
(e) Except as provided in subsection (f) of this section, a small business that
receives an award or investment for a Phase II small business innovation research award
or small business technology transfer award shall receive an award or investment in an
amount that is the lesser of:
(1) 25% of the Phase II small business innovation research award or small
business technology transfer award; or
(2) $75,000.
(f) On the recommendation of the Executive Director, the Board may approve an
award or investment in a small business in excess of the limitations specified under
subsections (d) and (e) of this section if the Board determines that the award is necessary
to better serve the community and the purposes of the Program.
(g) During each fiscal year:
(1) the Corporation may not provide more than 20 awards or investments
in accordance with subsection (d) of this section or more than 10 awards or investments in
accordance with subsection (e) of this section; and
(2) a small business may not receive more than one award or investment.
(h)] A small business may not receive:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 201
(1) MORE THAN ONE AWARD OR INVESTMENT DURING EACH FISCAL
YEAR; AND
(2) more than three awards or investments under this part.
[(i)] (E) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, each quarter, the
Corporation shall provide awards and investments on a competitive basis to eligible small
businesses.
(2) In providing an award or investment under this section, the
Corporation:
(i) shall consider:
1. the impact of the award or investment on the small
business; and
2. how the small business will utilize the award or
investment toward commercialization of the research conducted by the small business; and
(ii) may consider any additional criteria specified by the Corporation
in regulation.
[(j)] (F) The Program shall coordinate with comparable State and county
programs to:
(1) conduct marketing and outreach, including conducting joint workshops,
online training opportunities, and outreach to economically disadvantaged small
businesses, minority–owned small businesses, women–owned small businesses, rural small
businesses, and first–time small business innovation research award or small business
technology transfer award applicants; and
(2) provide assistance to eligible businesses under this part.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 3 –